Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 624.714, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Where application made; authority to issue permit; criteria; scope. (a) Applications by Minnesota residents for permits to carry shall be made to the county sheriff where the applicant resides. Nonresidents, as defined in section 171.01, subdivision 42, may apply to any sheriff. (b) Unless a sheriff denies a permit under the exception set forth in subdivision 6, paragraph (a), clause (3), a sheriff must issue a permit to an applicant if the person: (1) has training in the safe use of a pistol; (2) is at least deleted text begin 21deleted text end new text begin 18new text end years old and a citizen or a permanent resident of the United States; (3) completes an application for a permit; (4) is not prohibited from possessing a firearm under the following sections: (i) 518B.01, subdivision 14; (ii) 609.224, subdivision 3; (iii) 609.2242, subdivision 3; (iv) 609.749, subdivision 8; (v) 624.713; (vi) 624.719; (vii) 629.715, subdivision 2; (viii) 629.72, subdivision 2; or (ix) any federal law; and (5) is not listed in the criminal gang investigative data system under section 299C.091. (c) A permit to carry a pistol issued or recognized under this section is a state permit and is effective throughout the state. (d) A sheriff may contract with a police chief to process permit applications under this section. If a sheriff contracts with a police chief, the sheriff remains the issuing authority and the police chief acts as the sheriff's agent. If a sheriff contracts with a police chief, all of the provisions of this section will apply.